Maryland, session 2026, HB0250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–514.
(a) (1) In addition to being subject to an injunctive action under this subtitle,
a person who violates any provision of this subtitle or any regulation, order, or permit
– 1 –

Ch. 273 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
adopted or issued under this subtitle is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 per
violation to be collected in a civil action brought by the Department.
(2) Each day a violation occurs or continues is a separate violation under
this subsection.
(3) (i) Before bringing a civil action against a local government under
this subsection, the Department shall meet and consult with the local government to seek
an alternative resolution to the contested issue.
(ii) Prior consultation by the Department with the local government
shall constitute compliance with this subsection.
(b) A person who violates a provision of this subtitle or a regulation adopted under
this subtitle is subject to the penalties provided in § 9–343 of this article.
(C) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE AT LAW OR IN
EQUITY AND AFTER AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, WHICH MAY BE WAIVED IN
WRITING BY THE PERSON ACCUSED OF A VIOLATION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
IMPOSE A PENALTY FOR VIOLATION OF ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY
REGULATION, ORDER, OR PERMIT ADOPTED OR ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE PENALTY IMPOSED ON A PERSON UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE:
(I) UP TO $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION, BUT NOT EXCEEDING
$100,000 TOTAL; AND
(II) ASSESSED WITH CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO:
1. THE WILLFULNESS OF THE VIOLATION, THE EXTENT
TO WHICH THE EXISTENCE OF THE VIOLATION WAS KNOWN TO BUT UNCORRECTED
BY THE VIOLATOR, AND THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE VIOLATOR EXERCISED
REASONABLE CARE;
2. ANY ACTUAL HARM TO THE ENVIRONMENT OR TO
HUMAN HEALTH, INCLUDING INJURY TO OR IMPAIRMENT OF THE USE OF THE
WATERS OF THE STATE OR THE NATURAL RESOURCES OF THE STATE;
3. THE COST OF CLEANUP AND THE COST OF
RESTORATION OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
4. THE NATURE AND DEGREE OF INJURY TO OR
INTERFERENCE WITH GENERAL WELFARE, HEALTH, AND PROPERTY;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 273
5. THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE LOCATION OF THE
VIOLATION, INCLUDING LOCATION NEAR WATERS OF THE STATE OR AREAS OF
HUMAN POPULATION, CREATES THE POTENTIAL FOR HARM TO THE ENVIRONMENT
OR TO HUMAN HEALTH OR SAFETY;
6. THE AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGY AND ECONOMIC
REASONABLENESS OF CONTROLLING, REDUCING, OR ELIMINATING THE VIOLATION;
7. THE DEGREE OF HAZARD OR HARM POSED BY THE
VIOLATION; AND
8. THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE CURRENT VIOLATION IS
PART OF A RECURRENT PATTERN OF THE SAME OR SIMILAR TYPE OF VIOLATION
COMMITTED BY THE VIOLATOR; AND
9. THE DEGREE OF COOPERATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT AFTER BEING NOTIFIED OF THE VIOLATION AND ANY GOOD FAITH
EFFORTS TO ADDRESS THE VIOLATION.
(3) EACH DAY A VIOLATION EXISTS IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) ANY PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS PAYABLE TO
THE STATE AND COLLECTIBLE IN ANY MANNER PROVIDED AT LAW FOR THE
COLLECTION OF DEBTS.
(5) IF ANY PERSON WHO IS LIABLE TO PAY A PENALTY IMPOSED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FAILS TO PAY THE PENALTY AFTER DEMAND, THE
AMOUNT, TOGETHER WITH INTEREST AND ANY COSTS THAT MAY ACCRUE, SHALL BE
A LIEN IN FAVOR OF THE STATE ON ANY:
(I) REAL PROPERTY OF THE PERSON WHEN RECORDED WITH
THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS
LOCATED; AND
(II) PERSONAL PROPERTY OF THE PERSON WHEN ATTACHED
AND LEVIED BY THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND RULES.
(D) BEFORE TAKING ANY CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION TO RECOVER A
PENALTY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL:
– 3 –

Ch. 273 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) PROVIDE THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE VIOLATED THIS
SUBTITLE WITH WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED PENALTY AND AN
OPPORTUNITY FOR AN INFORMAL MEETING CONCERNING SETTLEMENT OF THE
PROPOSED CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY;
(2) USE DISCRETION TO DETERMINE WHETHER A FORMAL
ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION IS APPROPRIATE; AND
(3) IF APPLICABLE, REVIEW ANY GOOD FAITH APPLICATION FROM
THE PERSON, OR AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PERSON, FOR A LOAN
FROM THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND.
[(c)] (D) (E) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, all funds
collected by the Department under this section, including any civil [penalty] OR
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES or any fine imposed by a court under the provisions of this
section, shall be paid into the Maryland Clean Water Fund.
(2) Funds collected by the Department under this section relating to an
unsafe condition shall be paid into the Private Dam Repair Fund.
5–515.
(a) After or concurrently with the service of a complaint under this subtitle
[relating to water appropriation and use], the Department may:
(1) Issue an order that requires the person to whom the order is directed to
take corrective action within a time set in the order;
(2) Send a written notice that requires the person to whom the notice is
directed to file a written report about the alleged violation; or
(3) Send a written notice that requires the person to whom the notice is
directed:
(i) To appear at a hearing before the Department at a time and place
the Department sets to answer the charges in the complaint; or
(ii) To file a written report and also to appear at a hearing before the
Department at a time and place the Department sets to answer the charges in the
complaint.
(b) Any order issued under this section is effective immediately, according to its
terms, when it is served.
5–516.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 273
(a) The Department shall give notice and hold any hearing related to orders
imposed under [the water appropriation and use provisions of] this subtitle in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(b) (1) Within 10 days after being served with an order under § 5–515(a)(1) of
this subtitle, the person served may request in writing a hearing before the Department.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if a request for a
hearing on an order is made under this subsection, the Department shall:
1. Hold the hearing promptly after receiving the request; and
2. Render a decision promptly after the hearing.
(ii) If a request for a hearing on an order is made under this
subsection and the Department alleges in the order that there is an imminent threat or
danger to the public health or safety or to the environment, the Department shall:
1. Hold the hearing within 10 days after receiving the
request; and
2. Render a decision within 10 days after the hearing.
(c) Within 10 days after being served with a notice under § 5–515(a)(2) of this
subtitle, the person served may request in writing a hearing before the Department.
(d) The Department may make a verbatim record of the proceedings of any
hearing held under this subtitle.
(e) (1) In connection with any hearing under this subtitle, the Department
may:
(i) Subpoena any person or evidence; and
(ii) Order a witness to give evidence.
(2) A subpoenaed witness shall receive the same fees and mileage
reimbursement as if the hearing were part of a civil action.
(3) If a person fails to comply with a subpoena or order issued under this
subsection, on petition of the Department, a circuit court, by order, may:
(i) Compel obedience to the Department’s order or subpoena; or
(ii) Compel testimony or the production of evidence.
– 5 –

Ch. 273 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) The court may punish as contempt any failure to obey its order issued
under this section.
9–320.
(a) There is a Maryland Clean Water Fund.
(b) Except as provided in § 9–303.4 of this subtitle, the following payments shall
be made into the Maryland Clean Water Fund:
(1) All application fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and funds collected by
the Department under this subtitle, including any civil or administrative penalty or any
fine imposed by a court under the provisions of this subtitle;
(2) [Any] WITH THE EXCEPTION OF PENALTIES AND FINES REQUIRED
TO BE PAID INTO THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND, ANY CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE
penalty or any fine imposed by a court under the provisions of Title 5, Subtitle 5 of this
article [relating to water appropriation and use];
(3) Any civil or administrative penalty or any fine imposed by a court under
the provisions of Title 4, Subtitle 1 of this article;
(4) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 2, Part
III of this title and §§ 9–269 and 9–270 of this title and any civil or administrative penalty
or fine imposed by a court under the provisions of Subtitle 2 of this title;
(5) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 24 of this
title and any civil or administrative penalty or fine imposed by a court under the provisions
of Subtitle 24 of this title; and
(6) Any other fees legally authorized to be paid into the Maryland Clean
Water Fund.
(c) The Department shall use the Maryland Clean Water Fund for activities that
are related to:
(1) The identification, monitoring, and regulation of the proper discharge
of effluent into the waters of the State including program development of these activities
as provided by the State budget;
(2) The management, conservation, protection, and preservation of the
State’s groundwater and surface water including program development of these activities
as provided by the State budget;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 273
(3) Correcting to the extent possible the failure to implement or maintain
erosion and sediment controls;
(4) Administration of the sediment control program;
(5) Emergency removal of sewage sludge or mitigation of the effect of any
utilization of sewage sludge that the Department finds:
(i) Endangers public health, safety, or welfare; or
(ii) Endangers or damages natural resources;
(6) Activities that are:
(i) Conducted by the Department, by a local health official, or by the
local health official’s designee under § 9–243(e) of this title;
(ii) Related to identifying, monitoring, or regulating the utilization
of sewage sludge, including program development; and
(iii) Conducted by the Department under Subtitle 24 of this title; and
(7) Providing supplemental inspections and monitoring of sewage sludge
utilization sites by:
(i) Contracting with a county on request of that county to provide
supplemental inspections and monitoring; and
(ii) Limiting the value of services provided under the contract to no
more than 45% of the generator fees for sludge utilized in that county that is generated
outside of that county or service area.
16–502.
(a) (1) A person who violates any provision of this title or any regulation,
permit, license, or order issued under this title shall be liable for a penalty not exceeding
$10,000, which may be recovered in a civil action.
(2) In imposing a penalty under this subsection, the court may consider the
factors in § 9–342(b)(2)(ii) of this article and any other relevant factors.
(3) EACH DAY A VIOLATION EXISTS IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION.
(b) The circuit court may issue an injunction requiring the person to cease the
violation and restore the area unlawfully dredged or filled.
– 7 –

Ch. 273 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) Before taking any civil action to recover a penalty under subsection (a) of this
section, the Department shall provide the person alleged to have violated this title with
written notice of the proposed penalty and an opportunity for an informal meeting
concerning settlement of the proposed civil action.
(D) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE AT LAW OR IN
EQUITY AND AFTER AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, WHICH MAY BE WAIVED IN
WRITING BY THE PERSON ACCUSED OF A VIOLATION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
IMPOSE A PENALTY FOR VIOLATION OF ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE OR ANY
REGULATION, ORDER, OR PERMIT ADOPTED OR ISSUED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(2) THE PENALTY IMPOSED ON A PERSON UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE:
(I) UP TO $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION, BUT NOT EXCEEDING
$100,000 TOTAL; AND
(II) ASSESSED WITH CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO:
1. THE WILLFULNESS OF THE VIOLATION, THE EXTENT
TO WHICH THE EXISTENCE OF THE VIOLATION WAS KNOWN TO BUT UNCORRECTED
BY THE VIOLATOR, AND THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE VIOLATOR EXERCISED
REASONABLE CARE;
2. ANY ACTUAL HARM TO THE ENVIRONMENT OR TO
HUMAN HEALTH, INCLUDING INJURY TO OR IMPAIRMENT OF THE USE OF THE
WATERS OF THE STATE OR THE NATURAL RESOURCES OF THE STATE;
3. THE COST OF CLEANUP AND THE COST OF
RESTORATION OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
4. THE NATURE AND DEGREE OF INJURY TO OR
INTERFERENCE WITH GENERAL WELFARE, HEALTH, AND PROPERTY;
5. THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE LOCATION OF THE
VIOLATION, INCLUDING LOCATION NEAR WATERS OF THE STATE OR AREAS OF
HUMAN POPULATION, CREATES THE POTENTIAL FOR HARM TO THE ENVIRONMENT
OR TO HUMAN HEALTH OR SAFETY;
6. THE AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGY AND ECONOMIC
REASONABLENESS OF CONTROLLING, REDUCING, OR ELIMINATING THE VIOLATION;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 273
7. THE DEGREE OF HAZARD POSED BY THE PARTICULAR
POLLUTANT OR POLLUTANTS INVOLVED; AND
8. THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE CURRENT VIOLATION IS
PART OF A RECURRENT PATTERN OF THE SAME OR SIMILAR TYPE OF VIOLATION
COMMITTED BY THE VIOLATOR.
(3) EACH DAY A VIOLATION EXISTS IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) ANY PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS PAYABLE TO
THE STATE AND COLLECTIBLE IN ANY MANNER PROVIDED AT LAW FOR THE
COLLECTION OF DEBTS.
(5) IF ANY PERSON WHO IS LIABLE TO PAY A PENALTY IMPOSED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FAILS TO PAY THE PENALTY AFTER DEMAND, THE
AMOUNT, TOGETHER WITH INTEREST AND ANY COSTS THAT MAY ACCRUE, SHALL BE
A LIEN IN FAVOR OF THE STATE ON ANY:
(I) REAL PROPERTY OF THE PERSON WHEN RECORDED WITH
THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS
LOCATED; AND
(II) PERSONAL PROPERTY OF THE PERSON WHEN ATTACHED
AND LEVIED BY THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND RULES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 9 –